Utah statutes.
48-2e-1142.   Plan of conversion.

(1)  A domestic limited partnership may convert to a different type of entity under Sections 48-2e-1141 through 48-2e-1146 by approving a plan of conversion.  The plan must be in a record and contain:

(a)  the name of the converting limited partnership;

(b)  the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

(c)  the manner of converting the interests in the converting limited partnership into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

(d)  the proposed public organic record of the converted entity if it will be a filing entity;

(e)  the full text of the private organic rules of the converted entity that are proposed to be in a record;

(f)  the other terms and conditions of the conversion; and

(g)  any other provision required by the law of this state or the partnership agreement of the converting limited partnership.

(2)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), a plan of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

